Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 1 General Provisions

38-2-1000.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Code of Military Justice.”

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1000

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1001.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, or has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused.

“Another state” means any one of the several states of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, and the United States Virgin Islands.

“Apprehension” means the taking of a person into custody.

“Arrest” means the restraint of a person by oral or written order that is not imposed as punishment and that directs such person to remain within specified limits.

“Arrest in quarters” means a punishment requiring a person to remain within his or her military residence, whether a tent, stateroom, or other quarters assigned, or a private residence when government quarters have not been provided during the period of punishment.

“Cadet,” “candidate,” or “midshipman” means a person enrolled in or attending a military academy, regional training institute, or any other formal education program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned officer in the organized militia.

“Classified information” means any information or material that has been determined by an official of the United States or of another state, pursuant to law, an executive order, or regulation, to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national or state security.

“Commander” means:

A commissioned officer of the organized militia who is in command or who is in charge;

The Governor; or

The adjutant general.

“Commanding officer” means a commander.

“Confinement” means physical restraint imposed by order of competent authority depriving a person of freedom.

“Convening authority” means the person convening the court, a successor in office, or an authorized designee of the person or successor.

“Enlisted member” means a person in an enlisted grade.

“Judge advocate” means an individual who is certified or designated as such by the Judge Advocate General of the United States Army or Air Force or certified by the state judge advocate as competent to perform such military justice duties required by this article. Such individual shall be a commissioned officer of the organized militia.

“Military court” means a court-martial or court of inquiry.

“Military judge” means an official of a general or special court-martial detailed by the convening authority.

“Organized militia” means the National Guard of this state as provided for by Title 32 of the United States Code, the Georgia Naval Militia, and any other military force organized under the Constitution and laws of this state when not in a status subjecting such force or forces to exclusive jurisdiction under Chapter 47 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

“Record,” when used in connection with the proceedings of a court-martial, means:

An official written transcript, written summary, or other writing relating to the proceedings; or

An official audiotape, videotape, digital image or file, or similar material from which sound, or sound and visual images, depicting the proceedings may be reproduced.

“Senior force commander” means the assistant adjutant general for army, the assistant adjutant general for air, or the brigadier general in charge of the State Defense Force.

“Superior commissioned officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1001

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 38/HB 737.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 801

.

38-2-1002.
Applicability; jurisdiction.

This article shall apply to all members of the organized militia at all times and in all places when not serving as provided for by Title 10 of the United States Code.

Subject matter jurisdiction under this article shall be established if a nexus exists between an offense set forth in Part 10 of this article, except as provided in Code Section 38-2-1111 or 38-2-1112.1, and the organized militia. When a member is in a status as provided for by Title 32 of the United States Code or on state active duty, a rebuttable presumption exists that such nexus is established. As used in this paragraph, the term “state active duty” means full-time duty in the organized militia under an order of the Governor or otherwise issued by authority of law and paid by funds of this state, including travel to and from such duty.

Courts-martial shall have primary jurisdiction of an offense set forth in Part 10 of this article, except as provided in Code Section 38-2-1111 or 38-2-1112.1.

A proper civilian court shall have primary jurisdiction of a nonmilitary offense when such act or omission violates both this article and local civilian criminal law, foreign or domestic. In such case, a court-martial may be initiated only after the civilian authority has declined to prosecute or dismissed such charge; provided, however, that jeopardy has not attached.

Jurisdiction over attempted crimes, conspiracy crimes, solicitation, and accessory crimes shall be determined by the underlying offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1002

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 802

.

38-2-1003.
Discharge fraudulently obtained.

Each person discharged from the organized militia who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained such discharge shall be, subject to Code Section 38-2-1043, subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and is, after apprehension, subject to this article while in custody under the direction of the organized militia for that trial. Upon conviction of such charge, such person shall be subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this article committed prior to the fraudulent discharge.

No person who has deserted from the organized militia shall be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this article by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1003

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 803

.

38-2-1004.
Calculating forfeiture punishments.

When calculating forfeiture punishments under this article for nonactive duty members of the Georgia National Guard, each unit training assembly shall constitute a day. Otherwise, any punishment authorized by this article which is measured in terms of days shall mean successive days when served in a status of annual field training and shall mean succeeding duty days when served in a status other than annual field training.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1004

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

38-2-1005.
Territorial applicability of article.

This article shall be applicable at all times and in all places, provided that either the person subject to this article is in a duty status or, if not in a duty status, that there is a nexus between the act or omission constituting an offense under this article and the efficient functioning of the organized militia. Such grant of military jurisdiction shall neither preclude nor limit civilian jurisdiction over an offense except when the prohibition of double jeopardy is concerned.

Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the organized militia while those units are serving outside of this state with the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this article as if such proceedings were held inside this state, and offenses committed outside this state may be tried and punished under this article either inside or outside this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1005

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 805

.

38-2-1006.
State judge advocate; appointment; eligibility; staff judge advocate.

The Governor, on the recommendation of the adjutant general, shall appoint an individual to serve as the state judge advocate. To be eligible for such appointment, such individual shall be a judge advocate, a member of the State Bar of Georgia in good standing for not less than ten years, and have not less than five years of continuous service in the army or air National Guard of this state. The state judge advocate shall serve as the primary legal adviser to the adjutant general and shall serve as the judge advocate on the joint staff. The state judge advocate shall supervise the Office of the State Judge Advocate and shall have authority for assignment, placement, and billeting of all judge advocates.

The assistant adjutant general for army, the assistant adjutant general for air, and the brigadier general in charge of the State Defense Force, on the recommendation of the state judge advocate, shall each appoint a staff judge advocate for the Army National Guard, a staff judge advocate for the Air National Guard, and a staff judge advocate for the State Defense Force, respectively. Such staff judge advocates shall serve as the respective primary legal advisers to the assistant adjutant general for army, the assistant adjutant general for air, and the brigadier general in charge of the State Defense Force.

The state judge advocate, or his or her assistants, shall make frequent inspections in the field in supervision of the administration of military justice in the organized militia.

Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with a judge advocate in the same military service in matters relating to the administration of military justice.

No person who has acted as member, military judge, trial counsel, defense counsel, or investigating officer, or who has been a witness, in any case may later act in any capacity in any reviewing authority upon the same case.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-2-1006

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 753, § 1/HB 98; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 38/HB 323.

U.S. Code.

For similar provision in Uniform Code of Military Justice, see

10 U.S.C. § 806

.